yeoman-custom/cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/ta_rules
//sort
_வசந்) த		tV#
    _ப) த (ஞ்சலி	tV
   _கீழ்) த (ட்ட		tV
  _மேல்) த (ட்ட		tV
 பிள்ளை) த (ன		tV
முட்டாள்) த (ன		tV
  _கௌ) த (ம		tV
  _கௌ) த (மி		tV
    _கீ) த (ா		t
    _சீ) த (ா		t
    _ல) த (ா		t
   _சபி) த (ா		t
   _சபீ) த (ா		t
   அனி) த (ா		t
   சுஜா) த (ா		t
   லலி) த (ா		t
  _சுனி) த (ா		t
  _ஹரி) த (ா		t
 _வனி) த (ா		t
 _வினி) த (ா		t
_நிவேதி) த (ா		t
_புஷ்பல) த (ா		t
பிரேமல) த (ா		t
  _மும்) த (ாஜ		t
   _நே) த (ாஜி		t
   _சுல்) த (ான		t
  _முல்) த (ான		t
   _சும) த (ி		t
  _சாந்) த (ி		t
  _சுகந்) த (ி		t
  _ரேவ) த (ி		t
  _வசந்) த (ி		t
  வாசந்) த (ி		t
 _கோம) த (ி		t
 ஜெயந்) த (ி 		t
_துஷ்யந்) த (ி		t
_பார்வ) த (ி		t
_பிரசார்_பார) த (ி	t
பிரபாவ) த (ி		t
 _ஜோ) திக (ா		tik
   _கார்) திக்		tik
   சட்ட) த (ிட்ட		t
    எ) தியோப (ிய	tijo:p
   _பிர) த (ீ		t
	த (ுறை		t
   வீண்) த (ேவை		t
   வீண்) த (ொல்லை	t
 அம்பே) த்க		tkV#
     யு) த்த		ddV#
 _சிரார்) த்த		ddV#
 _ஸ்ரார்) த்த		ddV#
_சிறை) த்த (ண்டனை	ddV
     பு) த்த (ன		ddV
  _வர்) த்த (மான		ddV
     பு) த்த (ர		ddV
  _விரு) த்தாச (ல	dda:tSV
    அ) த்த (ாசி		dd
    _சி) த்தாந்த		dda:ntV#
     சி) த்த (ார்		dd
     பு) த்த (ி		dd
 அயோ) த்த (ி		dd
 எட்டு) த்த (ிக்க		dd
    _ம) த்த (ிக்கு	dd
    சில) த்த (ினங்	dd
    பல) த்த (ினங்	dd
     சா) த்த (ிய		dd
     ம) த்த (ிய		dd
    வா) த்த (ிய		dd
   வை) த்த (ிய		dd
   _சா) த்த (ிய_		tt
     பு) த்த (ியி	dd
   _சா) த்த (ியிரு	tt
    உ) த்த (ியோக	dd
     பு) த்த (ிர		tt
    சமு) த்த (ிர		dd
   _உப) த்த (ிர		dd
   _சுப) த்த (ிர		dd
   _ரு) த்த (ிர		dd
 _ரௌ) த்த (ிர		dd
    _சூ) த்த (ிரன	dd
    _சூ) த்த (ிரரி	dd
    _சூ) த்த (ிரர்		dd
   ஆதி) த்தி (ராவிட	dd
   ராஜ) த்து (ரோக	dd
  _தேச) த்து (ரோகி	td
    வி) த்து (வான	d
  _முக) த்து (வார	dd
    அ) த்த (ெய்வ		dd
   L03) த்த (ெய்வ	dd
   குல) த்த (ெய்வ	dd
    உ) த்த (ேச		dd
   L03) த்த (ேச		dd   // a, e, i
    வி) த்த (ையாக	dd
    வி) த்த (ையால்_	dd
    வி) த்த (ையி	dd
    வி) த்த (ையை	dd
     ச) த (்ய		t
     நி) த (்ய		t
    இ) த் (யாதி		t
_காமசூ) த் (ர		t
     ச) த்ரபதி		trVpVti
     சி) த (்ரா		t
   பவி) த (்ரா		t
     ச) த (்ரு		t
     த) த (்ரூப		t
    பா) த (்ரூம		t
  _மை) த் (ரேய		t
//endsort


.group ந
	ந	nV
	ந (B	n  // dental n
     _) நி (யாய	n
     _) நி (யூ	n


.group ன
	ன	nV
	ன (B	n  // alveolar n


.group ப
	ப	bV
	ப (B	b
     _) ப	pV
     _) ப (B	p
     _) ப (T+	bV	// if word has $alt attribute in ta_list
     _) ப (BT+	b	// if word has $alt
	ப் (ப	p
     ப்) ப	pV
     ப்) ப (B	p
   L02)	ப	pV#
   குஷ்) ப (ு	b

     ம) ப	pV
     ம) ப (ா	p
     ம) ப (B	b
     த) ப	pV
     த) ப (ா	p
     த) ப (B	b

	ப (ுர	p
     ம்) ப (ா	b
	ப (ூர	p
	ப (ட்டர	bV

//sort
